Utah statutes.
59-12-602.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), "airport facility" means an airport of
regional significance, as defined by the Transportation Commission by rule
made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act.
(b)  "Airport facility" includes:
(i)  an appurtenance to an airport, including a fixed guideway that provides
transportation service to or from the airport;
(ii)  a control tower, including a radar system;
(iii)  a public area of an airport; or
(iv)  a terminal facility.
(2)  "Convention facility" means any publicly owned or operated convention
center, sports arena, or other facility at which conventions, conferences, and
other gatherings are held and whose primary business or function is to host
such conventions, conferences, and other gatherings.
(3)  "Cultural facility" means any publicly owned or operated museum, theater,
art center, music hall, or other cultural or arts facility.
(4)  "Recreation facility" or "tourist facility" means any publicly owned or
operated park, campground, marina, dock, golf course, water park, historic
park, monument, planetarium, zoo, bicycle trails, and other recreation or
tourism-related facility.
(5) (a)  "Restaurant" includes any coffee shop, cafeteria, luncheonette, soda
fountain, or fast-food service where food is prepared for immediate
consumption.
(b)  "Restaurant" does not include:
(i)   any retail establishment whose primary business or function is the sale
of fuel or food items for off-premise, but not immediate, consumption; and
(ii)  a theater that sells food items, but not a dinner theater.
